Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1223.01
Department; develop program.

The department shall develop a program that is designed to train individuals to become licensed natural resources ground water technicians. Such course shall be developed by the department in consultation with the natural resources districts. Such course shall include inspection of chemigation systems, measuring and recording static water levels, inspecting and servicing flow meters, and taking water samples. Training sessions shall not be less than two hours and shall not exceed eight hours.

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1160.